Connecticut, session 2026, SB00517.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) (1) Notwithstanding any
provision of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Transportation
shall convey to the town of Branford two parcels of land located in the
town of Branford, at a cost equal to the fair market value of the property,
as determined by the average of the appraisals of two independent
appraisers selected by the commissioner, plus the administrative costs
of making such conveyance.
(2) (A) The first parcel of land has an area of approximately 7.2 acres
and is identified as Lot 1 on a map entitled "Overall Proposed Roadway
Improvement Plan and Master Redevelopment Plan (Commercial
Pkwy/Exit 53) – Route 1 at SR. 794 (Branford Connector) Commercial
Parkway, and Route 146; Branford, Connecticut – Designed J.O.M,
Drawn J.M.B, Checked ___, Approved ___, Scale 1"=200', Project No.
2500951, Date 03/06/2026, CAD File PB2500951A".
(B) The second parcel of land has an area of approximately 11.66 acres
LCO No. 3611 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 517
and is identified as Lot 5 on the map specified in subparagraph (A) of
this subdivision.
(3) The conveyance of the parcels described in subdivision (2) of this
subsection shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties Review
Board.
(b) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcels of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section. The
Commissioner of Transportation shall have the sole responsibility for all
other incidents of such conveyance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section